District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.18

Dividends not to be declared if corporation is thereby rendered insolvent or capital decreased — Trustees personally liable for debts.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1287, ch. 854, § 622
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.18.
1981 Ed., § 29-218.
1973 Ed., § 29-218.